Illinois, session 104th, HB3712.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Privacy Protections for Location Information Derived from 6Electronic Devices Act. 7    Section 5. Legislative intent. The General Assembly 8intends to protect the reproductive health access, safety of 9LGBTQ lives, religious liberty, and freedom of movement by 10passage of this Act. 11    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:12    "Application" means a software program that runs on the 13operating system of a device. 14    "Collect" means to obtain, infer, generate, create, 15receive, or access an individual's location information. 16    "Consent" means freely given, specific, informed, 17unambiguous, opt-in consent. "Consent" does not include (i) 18agreement secured without first providing to the individual a 19clear and conspicuous disclosure of all information material 20to the provision of consent, apart from any privacy policy, 21terms of service, terms of use, general release, user 22agreement, or other similar document; or (ii) agreement   HB3712- 2 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1obtained through the use of a user interface designed or 2manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or 3impairing user autonomy, decision making, or choice. 4    "Covered entity" means any individual, partnership, 5corporation, limited liability company, association, or other 6group, however organized. "Covered entity" includes all agents 7of the entity. "Covered entity" does not include a State or 8local government agency, or a State court, a clerk of the 9court, or a judge or justice. "Covered entity" does not 10include an individual acting in a noncommercial context. 11    "Device" means a mobile telephone or any other electronic 12device that is or may commonly be carried by or on an 13individual or that is a component part of a motor vehicle and 14is capable of connecting to a cellular, bluetooth, or other 15wireless network. 16    "Disclose" means to make location information available to 17a third party, including, but not limited to, by sharing, 18publishing, releasing, transferring, disseminating, providing 19access to, or otherwise communicating such location 20information orally, in writing, electronically, or by any 21other means. 22    "Individual" means a person located in the State. 23    "Location information" means information derived from a 24device or from interactions between devices, with or without 25the knowledge of the user and regardless of the technological 26method used, that pertains to or directly or indirectly   HB3712- 3 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1reveals the present or past geographical location of an 2individual or device within the State with sufficient 3precision to identify street-level location information within 4a range of 1,850 feet or less. "Location information" 5includes, but is not limited to, (i) an internet protocol 6address capable of revealing the physical or geographical 7location of an individual, (ii) Global Positioning System 8(GPS) coordinates; and (iii) cell-site location information. 9"Location information" does not include location information 10identifiable or derived solely from the visual content of a 11legally obtained image, including the location of the device 12that captured such image or publicly posted words. 13    "Location privacy policy" means a description of the 14policies, practices, and procedures controlling a covered 15entity's collection, processing, management, storage, 16retention, and deletion of location information. 17    "Monetize" means to collect, process, or disclose an 18individual's location information for profit or in exchange 19for monetary or other consideration. "Monetize" includes, but 20is not limited to, selling, renting, trading, or leasing 21location information. 22    "Person" means any natural person. 23    "Permissible purpose" means one of the following purposes: 24(i) provision of a product, service, or service feature to the 25individual to whom the location information pertains when that 26individual requested the provision of such product, service,   HB3712- 4 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1or service feature by subscribing to, creating an account, or 2otherwise contracting with a covered entity; (ii) initiation, 3management, execution, or completion of a financial or 4commercial transaction or fulfill an order for specific 5products or services requested by an individual, including any 6associated routine administrative, operational, and 7account-servicing activity such as billing, shipping, 8delivery, storage, and accounting; (iii) compliance with an 9obligation under federal or State law; or (iv) response to an 10emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 11communication, or any other communication reporting an 12imminent threat to human life. 13    "Process" means to perform any action or set of actions on 14or with location information, including, but not limited to, 15collecting, accessing, using, storing, retaining, analyzing, 16creating, generating, aggregating, altering, correlating, 17operating on, recording, modifying, organizing, structuring, 18disposing of, destroying, deidentifying, or otherwise 19manipulating location information. "Process" does not include 20disclosing location information. 21    "Reasonably understandable" means of length and complexity 22such that an individual with an 8th-grade reading level, as 23established by the State Board of Education, can read and 24comprehend. 25    "Service feature" means a discrete aspect of a service 26provided by a covered entity, including, but not limited to,   HB3712- 5 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1real-time directions, real-time weather, and identity 2authentication. 3    "Service provider" means an individual, partnership, 4corporation, limited liability company, association, or other 5group, however organized, that collects, processes, or 6transfers location information for the sole purpose of, and 7only to the extent that such service provider is, conducting 8business activities on behalf of, for the benefit of, at the 9direction of, and under contractual agreement with a covered 10entity. 11    "Third party" means any covered entity or person other 12than (i) a covered entity that collected or processed location 13information in accordance with this Act or its service 14providers or (ii) the individual to whom the location 15information pertains. 16    Section 15. Protection of location information. 17    (a) It is unlawful for a covered entity to collect or 18process an individual's location information except for a 19permissible purpose. Before collecting or processing an 20individual's location information for one of those permissible 21purposes, a covered entity shall provide the individual with a 22copy of the location privacy policy and obtain consent from 23that individual; however, this shall not be required when the 24collection and processing is done in (i) compliance with an 25obligation under federal or State law or (ii) in response to an   HB3712- 6 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 2communication, or any other communication reporting an 3imminent threat to human life. For purposes of this 4subsection, a consumer accessing, procuring, or searching for 5services regarding contraception, pregnancy care, including, 6but not limited to, abortion services, does not constitute an 7imminent threat to human life.8    (b) If a covered entity collects location information for 9the provision of multiple permissible purposes, it should be 10mentioned in the location privacy policy and individuals shall 11provide discrete consent for each purpose; however, this shall 12not be required for the purpose of collecting and processing 13location information to comply with an obligation under 14federal or State law or to respond to an emergency service 15agency, an emergency alert, a 911 communication, or any other 16communication reporting an imminent threat to human life. 17    (c) A covered entity that directly delivers targeted 18advertisements as part of its product or services shall 19provide individuals with a clear, conspicuous, and simple 20means to opt out of the processing of their location 21information for purposes of selecting and delivering targeted 22advertisements. 23    (d) Consent provided under this Section expires (i) after 24one year, (ii) when the initial purpose for processing the 25information has been satisfied, or (iii) when the individual 26revokes consent, whichever occurs first, as long as the   HB3712- 7 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1consent may be renewed pursuant to the same procedures. Upon 2expiration of consent, any location information possessed by a 3covered entity must be permanently destroyed. 4    (e) It shall be unlawful for a covered entity or service 5provider that lawfully collects and processes location 6information to:7        (1) collect more precise location information than 8    necessary to carry out the permissible purpose; 9        (2) retain location information longer than necessary 10    to carry out the permissible purpose; 11        (3) sell, rent, trade, or lease location information 12    to third parties; 13        (4) derive or infer from location information any data 14    that is not necessary to carry out a permissible purpose; 15    or16        (5) disclose, cause to disclose, or assist with or 17    facilitate the disclosure of an individual's location 18    information to third parties, unless such disclosure is 19    (i) necessary to carry out the permissible purpose for 20    which the information was collected or (ii) requested by 21    the individual to whom the location data pertains. 22    (f) It is unlawful for a covered entity or service 23providers to disclose location information to any federal, 24State, or local government agency or official unless: 25        (1) the agency or official serves the covered entity 26    or service provider with a valid warrant;   HB3712- 8 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1        (2) disclosure is mandated under federal or State law; 2        (3) the data subject requests such disclosure; or 3        (4) a natural person is at risk or danger of death or 4    serious physical injury, as long as: 5            (A) the request is approved by a high-ranking 6        agency officer for emergency access to a consumer's 7        personal information; 8            (B) the request is based on the agency's good 9        faith determination that it has a lawful basis to 10        access the information on a nonemergency basis; and 11            (C) the agency agrees to petition a court for an 12        appropriate order within 3 days and to destroy the 13        information if that order is not granted. 14        For purposes of this subsection, a consumer accessing, 15    procuring, or searching for services regarding 16    contraception, pregnancy care, and perinatal care, 17    including, but not limited to, abortion services, does not 18    constitute a natural person being at risk or danger of 19    death or serious physical injury. 20    (g) A covered entity shall maintain and make available to 21the data subject a location privacy policy, which shall 22include, at a minimum, the following: 23        (1) the permissible purpose for which the covered 24    entity is collecting, processing, or disclosing any 25    location information; 26        (2) the type of location information collected,   HB3712- 9 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1    including the precision of the data; 2        (3) the identities of service providers with which the 3    covered entity contracts with respect to location data; 4        (4) any disclosures of location data necessary to 5    carry out a permissible purpose and the identities of the 6    third parties to whom the location information could be 7    disclosed; 8        (5) whether the covered entity's practices include the 9    internal use of location information for purposes of 10    targeted advertisement; 11        (6) the data management and data security policies 12    governing location information; and13        (7) the retention schedule and guidelines for 14    permanently deleting location information. 15    (h) A covered entity in lawful possession of location 16information shall provide notice to individuals to whom that 17information pertains of any change to its location privacy 18policy at least 20 business days before the change goes into 19effect and shall request and obtain consent before collecting 20or processing location information in accordance with the new 21location privacy policy. 22    (i) It shall be unlawful for a governmental entity to 23monetize location information. 24    Section 20. Prohibition against retaliation. A covered 25entity may not take adverse action against an individual   HB3712- 10 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1because the individual exercised or refused to waive any of 2such individual's rights under this Act, unless location data 3is essential to the provision of the good, service, or service 4feature that the individual requests, and then only to the 5extent that this data is essential. This prohibition includes, 6but is not limited to: 7        (1) refusing to provide a good or service to the 8    individual; 9        (2) charging different prices or rates for goods or 10    services, including through the use of discounts or other 11    benefits or imposing penalties; or 12        (3) providing a different level or quality of goods or 13    services to the individual. 14    Section 25. Enforcement. 15    (a) A violation of this Act or a rule adopted by the 16Department of Innovation and Technology regarding an 17individual's location information constitutes an injury to 18that individual. 19    (b) Any individual alleging a violation of this Act by a 20covered entity or service provider may bring a civil action in 21State court. 22    (c) An individual protected by this Act may not be 23required, as a condition of service or otherwise, to accept 24mandatory arbitration of a claim arising under this Act. 25    (d) In a civil action in which the plaintiff prevails, the   HB3712- 11 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1court may award:2        (1) actual damages, including damages for emotional 3    distress, or $5,000 per violation, whichever is greater; 4        (2) punitive damages; and 5        (3) any other relief, including, but not limited to, 6    an injunction or declaratory judgment that the court deems 7    to be appropriate. 8        (e) For purposes of subsection (e) of Section 15, a 9    covered entity that, in more than one instance, violates 10    (1) through (4) of Section 15, from the same person using 11    the same method of collection or sale in violation of 12    subsection (e) of Section 15 has committed a single 13    violation of subsection (e) of Section 15 for which the 14    aggrieved person is entitled to, at most, one recovery 15    under this Section. 16        (f) For purposes of subsection (f) of Section 15, the 17    court shall consider each instance in which a covered 18    entity or service provider collects, processes, or 19    discloses location information in a manner prohibited by 20    subsection (f) of Section 15 as constituting a separate 21    violation of this Act or rule adopted under this Act. 22        (g) Upon motion, a court shall award reasonable 23    attorney's fees and costs, including expert witness fees 24    and other litigation expenses, to a plaintiff who is a 25    prevailing party in any action brought under this Act. In 26    awarding reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall   HB3712- 12 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1    consider the degree to which the relief obtained relates 2    to the relief sought. 3        (h) For the purpose of this Act, "prevailing party" 4    includes any party: 5            (1) who obtains some of the requested relief 6        through a favorable judicial judgment; 7            (2) who obtains some of the requested relief 8        through any settlement agreement approved by the 9        court; or 10            (3) whose pursuit of a nonfrivolous claim was a 11        catalyst for a unilateral change in position by the 12        opposing party relative to the relief sought. 13    (i) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind, 14including a covered entity's terms of service or policies, 15including, but not limited to, the location privacy policy, 16that purports to waive or limit in any way an individual's 17rights under this Act, including, but not limited to, any 18right to a remedy or means of enforcement, is deemed contrary 19to State law and is void and unenforceable. 20    (j) No private or government action brought under this Act 21precludes any other action under this Act. 22    Section 30. Nonapplicability. This Act does not apply to 23location information collected from a patient by a health care 24provider or health care facility, or collected, processed, 25used, or stored exclusively for medical education or research,   HB3712- 13 -LRB104 12247 JRC 22354 b1public health or epidemiological purposes, health care 2treatment, health insurance, payment, or operations, if the 3information is protected from disclosure under the federal 4Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 or 5other applicable federal and State laws, rules, and 6regulations.